South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4265.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 48-35-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 48-35-60.  Any person violating the provisions of this chapter may be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, may be fined not less than one thousand dollars but not more than two hundred five thousand dollars, or imprisoned for not more than thirty daysone year, or both, for a first offense. For any second or subsequent offense, a fine of not less than five hundredtwo thousand dollars but not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or imprisonment for not more than sixty daysthree years, or both may be imposed in the discretion of the court. "Subsequent offense,", as used in this section, shall mean an offense committed within ten years of a previous offense. SECTION 2.  Section 48-35-55 of the S.C. Code is repealed. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----